Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1413
Contract to administer act; authorized.

The Division of Motor Carrier Services of the Department of Motor Vehicles may contract with another state agency or an association organized under the laws of this state, not for profit, to administer for the division the parts of the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act as designated by the director.

Laws 1988, LB 836, § 13;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 33.